Colorado statutes. TITLE 33 Parks and Wildlife
ARTICLE 12
PASSES AND REGISTRATIONS

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1984 with an effective date of January 1, 1985. Prior to 1984, the substantive provisions of this article were contained in article 4 of this title and in § 33-7-102. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Cross references:

For the definitions applicable to this article 12, see § 33-10-102.

Section

33-12-100.2. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that the system of state parks and state recreation areas is vital to the economic health and well-being of the entire state of Colorado and that such system of parks and recreation areas provides an important benefit to the citizens of this state and to the tourists from outside the state who visit and make use of such state parks and recreation areas. Because of the nature and operation of such state parks and recreation areas, the system can be largely self-supporting, and the users of such resources can help to fund the system's operation and maintenance. The general assembly declares and intends that as a matter of state policy the system of state parks and state recreation areas should be financed as much as reasonably possible through revenues derived from the users of such system.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 1349, § 1, effective May 26.

33-12-101. Passes and registrations - rules - definition.

Except as specified in section 33-12-103 (1)(b), every pass or registration expires on the date printed or written on the face of the document. The commission may adopt rules establishing a subscription program through which a person to whom an annual pass has been issued pursuant to this article is notified, prior to the expiration of the pass, of the opportunity to renew the pass by mail or other means determined by the commission. As used in this article, "document" means pass or registration.

When, in articles 10 to 15 and 32 of this title or a rule adopted pursuant thereto, the doing of an act between certain dates or from one date to another is allowed or prohibited, the period of time indicated includes both dates specified.

Money received in payment for passes and registrations issued under articles 10 to 15 of this title shall not be refunded, except as follows:

For proven errors committed by the division in issuing passes or registrations;

For bona fide emergencies as may be determined by the division.

In the event of loss or destruction of a pass or registration, the person to whom the document was issued, upon payment of a fee of up to fifty percent of the cost of the original document, as established by the commission by rule, may obtain a replacement pass or registration by signing an affidavit stating where and by whom the document was issued and the circumstances under which the document was lost or destroyed. If the division determines that a pass or registration has been lost or destroyed in the mail, the person to whom the document was issued may obtain a replacement pass or registration without charge by signing an affidavit stating that the document was never received. The division shall supply agents selling documents with affidavit forms for obtaining a replacement pass or registration.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 892, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 95:

(1) (b) amended, p. 966, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(a) amended, p. 380, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 10-071), ch. 235, p. 1029, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2012:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1222, § 48, effective June 4.

L. 2018:

(3) amended, (SB 18-143), ch. 207, p. 1337, § 14, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-4-112 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Hunting, Fishing, and Parks for Future Generations Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 18-143, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 207, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

33-12-102. Types of passes and registrations - fees - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 892, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 85:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(b), and (2) amended, p. 1125, § 2, effective January 1, 1986.

L. 89:

(1.1) and (1.2) added and (2) amended, pp. 1349, 1351, §§ 2, 3, effective May 26; (1)(m) to (1)(q) added, p. 1368, § 2, effective April 1, 1990.

L. 90:

(1.3) added, p. 1834, § 2, effective March 22; (1.2)(d)(IV) added, p. 1536, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

L. 92:

(1.2)(d) amended, p. 2180, § 48, effective June 2.

L. 93:

IP(1.2)(d) amended, p. 381, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 95:

IP(1.2), (1.2)(i), (1.2)(l), IP(1.3), (1.3)(a) amended, p. 339, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 779, § 4, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 98:

(1.2)(a) amended, p. 1340, § 59, effective June 1; (1.2)(a) amended and (1.5) added, p. 1225, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(1.2)(a) and (1.5) amended and (3) added, p. 1529, § 2, effective May 1.

33-12-103. Aspen leaf annual pass - aspen leaf lifetime pass - rules - report.

A resident of this state, as defined in section 33-10-102, may obtain from the division an aspen leaf annual pass, which pass is valid from the date the pass is purchased through the last day of the month of purchase in the following year. The commission shall determine the age of eligibility for the aspen leaf pass.

A resident of this state, as defined in section 33-10-102, may obtain from the division an aspen leaf lifetime pass, which is valid from the date the pass is purchased through the lifetime of the pass holder. The age of eligibility for the aspen leaf lifetime pass is the same as that for the aspen leaf annual pass pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1). Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the fee for the aspen leaf lifetime pass is as set by rule of the commission; except that the fee shall not exceed five times the cost of the aspen leaf annual pass.

The aspen leaf lifetime pass shall not be sold on or after March 1, 2014.

Prior to that date but during the second regular session of the sixty-ninth general assembly, the department shall prepare and deliver a report to the senate agriculture and natural resources committee and the house of representatives agriculture, livestock, and natural resources committee, or their successor committees, evaluating the aspen leaf lifetime pass. The report shall include, at a minimum, the number of aspen leaf lifetime passes sold and the financial impacts of the aspen leaf lifetime pass.

Except as provided by rule of the commission, for the purpose of this section, the holder of an aspen leaf annual pass or aspen leaf lifetime pass shall own in whole or in part any vehicle used to enter a park area, the vehicle shall have a current valid registration issued by the department of revenue, and the pass holder shall be present in the vehicle. An aspen leaf pass or aspen leaf lifetime pass entitles the holder to enter state park and recreation areas during the period that the pass is valid and when such areas are open.

Each aspen leaf annual pass or aspen leaf lifetime pass shall be displayed by the person to whom it was issued, in the manner prescribed by the commission by rule, when the person enters a state park or state recreation area.

The continued use of the aspen leaf annual pass and the aspen leaf lifetime pass shall be subject to the holder's observance of rules concerning the state park or the state recreation area. For a violation of any of such rules, the division has the power to suspend the pass for six months; for a second violation, for one year; and, for a third violation, indefinitely. Any person aggrieved by an action of the division taken pursuant to this subsection (4) may appeal such action in accordance with the procedures provided in article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 893, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 381, § 2, effective April 12.

L. 98:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1225, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1530, § 5, effective May 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 380, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-071), ch. 235, p. 1029, § 2, effective August 11.

L. 2012:

(1)(a), (1)(b)(I), (2), and (3) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1222, § 49, effective June 4.

L. 2018:

(3) amended, (SB 18-143), ch. 207, p. 1337, § 15, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Hunting, Fishing, and Parks for Future Generations Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 18-143, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 207, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

33-12-103.5. Columbine annual pass - rules.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, a person is "disabled" if the person has been determined to be totally and permanently disabled by the social security administration, the division of workers' compensation, or pursuant to rule or regulation of the division.

A disabled resident may obtain from a regional office or the central office of the division, or at such other locations as may be determined by the division, a Columbine annual pass. The pass shall be valid from the date the pass is purchased through the last day of the month of purchase in the following year. A columbine annual pass shall entitle the disabled resident to enter state park and recreation areas during the period that the pass is valid and when such areas are open.

The commission, by rule, shall provide the manner by which a columbine annual pass shall be displayed by the person to whom it was issued when the person enters a state park or state recreation area.

(2.5) Any resident of the state who is a first responder with a permanent occupational disability as defined in section 33-4-104.5 (2) may obtain, free of charge, a columbine annual pass from the regional or the central office of the division, or such other location as may be determined by the division.

The continued use of the columbine annual pass shall be subject to the holder's observance of rules and regulations concerning the state park or state recreation area.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 1226, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(2) amended, p. 381, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2012:

(2)(b) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1223, § 50, effective June 4.

L. 2018:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 18-143), ch. 207, p. 1337, § 16, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(2.5) added, (HB 19-1080), ch. 222, p. 2251, § 2, effective August 2.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Hunting, Fishing, and Parks for Future Generations Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 18-143, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 207, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

33-12-103.7. Eagle annual pass - rules - definition.

A resident who is an active member of the National Guard may obtain from a regional office or the central office of the division, or at such other locations as may be determined by the division, an eagle annual pass free of charge. The pass is valid from the date the resident obtains it through the last day of the same month in the following year. An eagle annual pass entitles the resident active member of the National Guard to enter state park and recreation areas during the period that the pass is valid and when such areas are open.

The commission, by rule, shall provide the manner by which an eagle annual pass must be displayed by the person to whom it was issued when the person enters a state park or state recreation area.

For purposes of this section, "active member of the National Guard" means an individual who is a resident, as defined in section 33-1-102 (38), and has presented to the division a driver's license or identification card issued under article 2 of title 42 and an original statement signed by, or by direction of, the personnel officer or commander of the individual's unit, a senior noncommissioned officer who is part of the individual's chain of command, or higher headquarters that identifies the individual and establishes that the individual is an active member of the National Guard.

The continued use of the eagle annual pass is subject to the holder's observance of rules and regulations concerning the state park or state recreation area.

The general assembly may annually appropriate money to the division to implement this section. If the general assembly does not make such an appropriation, the commission need not offer an eagle annual pass until the general assembly makes such an appropriation.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (SB 20-041), ch. 224, p. 1100, § 1, effective September 14.

33-12-104. Pass and registration agents - reports - board of claims - unlawful acts - rules.

The director may designate sole proprietors, partnerships, or corporations having permanent business locations in this state as pass and registration agents to sell, at their permanent business locations, passes and registrations. Pass and registration agents shall be paid a commission on all moneys collected for passes and registrations sold by such agents in an amount determined by the commission by rule. All agents authorized to sell passes and registrations shall keep accurate records of all sales of passes and registrations and shall make such reports to the division regarding pass and registration sales as may be required. Such agents shall be required to give evidence of financial responsibility, in the form of a savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101, C.R.S., or an irrevocable letter of credit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101.5, C.R.S., or a bond, in such amount as may be fixed by the division to insure the remittance of all moneys collected from such pass and registration sales, less amounts allowed as commissions, and the making of reports required by the division. The commission may promulgate rules for the establishment and cancellation of pass and registration agencies. All pass and registration moneys received shall be kept separate and apart from any other moneys of the agent authorized to sell passes and registrations and shall at all times belong to the state. All moneys due from the sale of passes and registrations belong to the state and shall draw interest at the rate of one and one-half percent per month from the time that the agency is canceled by the division until paid.

The executive director, state auditor, and attorney general, or their duly designated representatives, shall constitute a board of claims for the hearing of all claims for relief when any agent is unable to account for passes and registrations and claims that the same have been destroyed, lost, or stolen. The findings of the board of claims are subject to review pursuant to section 24-4-106, C.R.S. Claims for relief in an amount totaling one hundred dollars or less shall not be determined by the board of claims, except as otherwise provided in this section, but shall be settled by the division. If the division offers to make settlement and such settlement is not accepted by the claimant, the claimant may submit his claim to the board of claims.

Every agent authorized to sell passes and registrations shall account for all passes and registrations delivered to such agent. If any agent is not able to account for any pass or registration, such agent shall be responsible for the maximum amount for which each unaccounted-for pass or registration could have been issued, except as provided in subsections (4) to (8) of this section.

Any agent authorized to sell passes and registrations may make a claim under oath for relief from responsibility for passes and registrations which have been lost, stolen, or destroyed and for which such agent is unable to account, but no claim for relief shall be considered unless the agent making the claim informs the division of such loss, theft, or destruction within thirty days after such loss, theft, or destruction is discovered, said notice to set forth in detail all pertinent information then known to the agent. Upon receipt of any claim for relief, it is the duty of the division to make an investigation of the claim as soon as practicable, and for that purpose the claimant shall make available such records, information, or other pertinent data as may be in his possession or under his control. A written report of such investigation shall be filed with the board of claims.

As soon as practicable after receipt of the investigator's report and in no event later than one hundred twenty days after receipt of notice of a claim for relief, the board of claims shall set a date for the hearing on such claim for relief, and the claimant may appear at the hearing if he so desires. The claimant shall be given not less than ten days' written notice of the date of the hearing, such notice to be mailed to his last-known address.

The board of claims may give relief to any claimant in the following circumstances and subject to the following limitations:

If the board of claims is satisfied that any passes or registrations were destroyed due to fire, flood, act of God, or any other cause beyond the control of the claimant and that destruction was not due in part to his negligence, then the board of claims may entirely relieve the claimant of the responsibility to account for such passes and registrations or make such lesser adjustment as the board of claims may deem proper.

If the board of claims is satisfied that any passes or registrations were either lost, stolen, or destroyed under circumstances other than those set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (6), the board of claims may, in its discretion, make an adjustment of the amount due for any such passes or registrations. The board of claims, in determining what adjustment, if any, shall be allowed for any lost, stolen, or destroyed passes and registrations, may consider the following:

Whether or not, or the extent to which, the loss was due to the negligence or carelessness of the claimant in the handling of passes and registrations, but no adjustment shall be made in the case of gross negligence or gross carelessness upon his part;

Such other evidence as the board of claims may consider pertinent.

The board of claims, in the event that it makes any adjustment upon a claim, may, in its discretion, require the use of such protection against the possibility of lost, stolen, or destroyed passes and registrations as it may deem proper, including, but not limited to, the posting of corporate or personal surety bonds.

It is the legislative intent of subsections (2) to (7) of this section to provide in proper cases for the relief of agents where passes or registrations have been lost, stolen, or destroyed, which relief, however, shall be strictly construed, it being the further intent of such subsections to encourage the proper and careful handling of such documents by pass and registration agents.

The commission may promulgate rules for the cash sale of passes and registrations to pass and registration agents of the division for resale to the public. Only agents of the division in good standing may qualify to purchase and sell under this subsection (9); except that no evidence of financial responsibility shall be required to qualify under this subsection (9). A post or base exchange of the United States government located in Colorado may qualify as an agent for the purpose of this subsection (9). Failure to comply with all applicable rules of the commission and lawful directives of the division regarding pass and registration agents constitutes grounds for the suspension or termination of such an agent, and, upon suspension or termination, all unsold passes and registrations shall be returned immediately to the division for return of cash in the amount paid by the agent for the passes and registrations. The commission, in connection with a program that it may adopt under this subsection (9), shall provide for redemption by the division, at least annually, of any unsold passes and registrations in the amount paid by the agent for such unsold passes and registrations. Subsections (1) to (8) of this section, except the provisions of subsection (1) regarding the designation of pass and registration agents, do not apply to passes and registrations sold under this subsection (9).

The commission may authorize certain employees to sell passes and registrations at the headquarters and regional offices of the division. Such employees are not entitled to a discount off of the face value of the passes and registrations and are not required to give evidence of financial responsibility. Such employees may make claims under oath for relief from responsibility for passes and registrations or moneys that have been lost, stolen, or destroyed and for which the employees are unable to account in accordance with subsections (4) to (8) of this section.

Any pass or registration agent who fails, upon demand of the division or its authorized representative, to account for passes and registrations or who fails to pay over to the division or its authorized representative money received from the sale of passes and registrations commits:

A petty offense if the amount is less than three hundred dollars;

A class 2 misdemeanor if the amount is three hundred dollars or more but less than one thousand dollars;

A class 1 misdemeanor if the amount is one thousand dollars or more but less than two thousand dollars;

A class 6 felony if the amount is more than two thousand dollars but less than five thousand dollars;

A class 5 felony if the amount is five thousand dollars or more but less than twenty thousand dollars;

A class 4 felony if the amount is twenty thousand dollars or more but less than one hundred thousand dollars;

A class 3 felony if the amount is one hundred thousand dollars or more but less than one million dollars; and

A class 2 felony if the amount is one million dollars or more.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 894, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 85:

(11)(b) amended, p. 660, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1), (9), and (10) amended, p. 489, § 38, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(11)(b) amended, p. 847, § 123, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(11)(b) amended, p. 1544, § 296, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1), (9), and (10) amended, p. 1530, § 6, effective May 1; (11)(a) amended, p. 1944, § 12, effective May 22.

L. 2012:

(1), (9), and (10) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1223, § 51, effective June 4.

L. 2021:

(11) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3262, § 565, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-4-112 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (11)(b), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

33-12-105. Licensing violations.

Except as otherwise provided in section 33-12-104 or by a commission rule regarding the manner by which a pass may be transferred, it is unlawful for any person to transfer, sell, or assign any pass or registration issued under articles 10 to 15 of this title 33 to another person. Any person who violates this subsection (1) commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of two hundred dollars.

Any person who makes any false statement or gives any false information in connection with purchasing or selling a pass or registration or who makes any alteration of a pass or registration commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of two hundred dollars, and any such statement, information, or alteration shall render such pass or registration void.

Any person who fails to obtain or make readily available for inspection by a parks and recreation officer or other peace officer an appropriate and valid pass commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of twenty-five dollars.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 897, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 970, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1944, § 13, effective May 22.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3697, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3263, § 566, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-12-106. Park entrance privileges - identified veterans - wounded warriors - backcountry search and rescue organizations conducting training activities - legislative declaration - rules.

Any resident who displays on the resident's vehicle a Colorado disabled veteran's license plate pursuant to section 42-3-304 (3)(a) or a purple heart special license plate pursuant to section 42-3-213 (2) must be allowed free entrance to any state park or recreation area, not to include campgrounds, on any day of the year such park or area is open. For the purpose of this section, display of such license plates entitles the disabled veteran or purple heart recipient and passengers in such disabled veteran's or purple heart recipient's vehicle to enter such park or recreation area free of charge.

Any resident who presents the documents necessary to satisfy the requirements of section 42-3-304 (3)(a) at a regional office or the central office of the division, or at such other locations as may be determined by the division, may obtain a transferable annual parks pass free of charge from the division.

Any resident who presents the documents necessary to satisfy the requirements of section 42-3-213 (2) at a regional office or the central office of the division, or at such other locations as may be determined by the division, may obtain a transferable annual parks pass free of charge from the division.

Repealed.

(2.3) The commission may promulgate rules to allow free entrance to any state park or recreation area, not to include campgrounds, yurts, or other amenities and services offered, for veterans on one day each year. The commission may determine by rule which day veterans are allowed free entrance to state parks and recreation areas.

(2.4) (a) The commission shall promulgate a rule to allow veterans, including active duty personnel, free entrance to any state park or recreation area, not to include campgrounds, yurts, or other amenities and services, for the month of August each year. The commission may promulgate a rule setting evidence standards to show a person is a veteran and issue a sticker or other device that identifies a person as a veteran for future entrance. The commission may also charge a fee for issuing the sticker or other device that identifies a person as a veteran, but the fee must be based on the direct and indirect cost of issuing the sticker or other device.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate moneys to the division to implement this subsection (2.4). If the general assembly does not make the appropriation, the commission need not offer free entrance to veterans to state parks or recreational areas until the money is appropriated.

(2.7) (a) (I) The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that:

Service members returning from post-September 11, 2001, overseas contingency operations who have been injured during combat face a challenging period of rehabilitation upon their return to the United States;

Many of these service members are so severely injured that they require medical assistance for many years, or even the rest of their lives, as they reenter mainstream life;

Although the scope of care provided by the United States armed services wounded warrior programs varies with each service member, based on the needs of the individual, these service members may be assigned, upon return to Colorado, to a medical treatment facility such as Evans army hospital at Fort Carson, Colorado;

Wounded warrior programs are direct efforts by the United States armed services to care for service members during their long transition from combat-related injury to civilian life and to provide assistance to those service members in recovery, rehabilitation, and reintegration that is worthy of their service and sacrifice; and

For those wounded warriors who suffer injuries so severe that they will require intense, ongoing care or assistance for many years or the rest of their lives, a significant part of the healing process is enabling and encouraging these service members to experience some of the outdoor recreational activities they enjoyed prior to their service-related injuries.

The general assembly therefore recognizes the need to provide opportunities for Colorado's severely injured "wounded warriors" to enjoy the natural resources of the state as part of their rehabilitative care. Furthermore, offering free entrance to state parks and recreation areas to such recovering service members is a small, but recognizable, acknowledgment of their selfless service and sacrifice.

The commission may promulgate rules to allow free entrance to any state park or recreation area, not to include campgrounds, yurts, or other amenities or services offered, for participants in the United States armed services wounded warrior programs who are residents of, or stationed in, Colorado. Any such rules must also allow for free admission of persons accompanying the wounded warrior program participant in the same vehicle.

As used in this subsection (2.7), "United States armed services wounded warrior programs" means:

The Army wounded warrior (AW2) program;

The Air Force wounded warrior (AFW2) program;

The Navy safe harbor program;

The Coast Guard wounded warrior regiment; and

Any successor program administered by a branch of the United States armed services to provide individualized support for service members who have been severely injured in overseas contingency operations undertaken since September 11, 2001.

Pursuant to section 33-10-115, a public or nonprofit backcountry search and rescue organization shall be allowed free entrance to any state park or recreation area on any day of the year such park or area is open, subject to availability.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 1270, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1973, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 2566, § 80, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(2) repealed, p. 163, § 1, effective March 28.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 1183, § 34, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

(3) added, (SB 09-182), ch. 148, p. 617, § 3, effective April 20.

L. 2011:

(2.3) and (2.7) added, (SB 11-024), ch. 79, p. 215, § 1, effective March 29.

L. 2012:

(2.3) and (2.7)(b) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1224, § 52, effective June 4.

L. 2015:

(2.4) added, (HB 15-1045), ch. 232, p. 862, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2020:

(1) amended, (SB 20-069), ch. 10, p. 44, § 1, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-245), ch. 358, p. 2339, § 7, effective June 27; (1)(a) amended and (1)(c) added, (HB 21-1116), ch. 204, p. 1071, § 1, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-245, see section 1 of chapter 358, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

33-12-106.5. Alternative means of park entrance - fees - rules.

An individual entering a state park or state recreation area by means other than by motor vehicle must purchase a pass in accordance with commission rules.

The commission, by rule, shall establish fees for passes for individuals entering a state park or state recreation area by means other than by motor vehicle. The commission may establish exemptions from such fees.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-143), ch. 207, p. 1337, § 17, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-249), ch. 273, p. 1590, § 9, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Hunting, Fishing, and Parks for Future Generations Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 18-143, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 207, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

33-12-107. Agreements with special districts to collect special district tolls for access road maintenance furnished by special districts. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1538, § 1, effective June 7.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 971, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section repealed, p. 1944, § 14, effective May 22.